Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB733.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 393A.020 is amended to read as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Property held, due, and owing in a foreign country if the transaction out of which
the property arose was a foreign transaction;
(2) Money, funds, or any other intangible property held by or owing:
(a) To a nonprofit exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
or
(b) For any minerals or other raw materials capable of being used for fuel in the
course of manufacturing, processing, production, or mining[; or
(c) For any mineral proceeds];
(3) Wages or salaries of fifty dollars ($50) or less that are not claimed by an employee
within one (1) year of the date the wages or salaries are earned, unless the amounts
are held on a payroll card;
(4) Moneys in inmate accounts and prisoner canteen accounts held by jailer under KRS
441.137; or
(5) Funds held in a lawyer IOLTA trust account under Supreme Court Rule 3.830.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:19 AM Jacketed